Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2494.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of pet food during the exclusion period by an individual purchaser for nonbusiness use. The following shall apply:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (i) The department shall publish a notice on its publicly accessible Internet website to give guidance on the implementation of the exclusion under this clause.(ii) For the purposes of this clause, the following terms or phrases shall have the following meanings:"Exclusion period" means the six-month period immediately following the effective date of this clause."Pet food" shall include, but not be limited to, dry food, wet food, raw food, gently cooked or fresh food and semi-moist food."Purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period, even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2494PN3378 - 2 - 123456789101112131415